California, session 20252026, SB1306.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Semiconductors are foundational to California’s economy, national security, and technological leadership, and are essential to the communications, transportation, health care, energy, and defense industries.(b) California stands at the forefront of semiconductor research and design. However, retaining and expanding in-state semiconductor manufacturing is critical to supply chains and economic competitiveness.(c) Semiconductor fabrication facilities rely on highly specialized industrial chemicals and solvents, including gamma-butyrolactone (GBL).(d) In 2010, the United States Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA), through promulgation of Section 1310.12 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, designated chemical mixtures containing GBL as exempt from specified regulatory requirements of the federal Controlled Substances Act if they have a concentration equal or less than 70 percent by weight or volume. In the rulemaking, the DEA identified the 70 percent concentration limit as an appropriate level that did not pose a significant risk of diversion to traffickers for illicit purposes.(e) California law has not been updated to reflect these federal exemptions. Existing state law, Section 11100 of the Health and Safety Code, includes GBL at any concentration level on the list of controlled precursor chemicals subject to reporting and regulatory requirements.(f) This misalignment imposes unnecessary compliance burdens on semiconductor manufacturers in California, including permitting, reporting, and enforcement requirements that are unrelated to public safety outcomes and that do not apply in other leading semiconductor manufacturing states.(g) Florida and New Jersey are significantly less restrictive in regards to regulation of GBL because their statutes exempt industrial uses, while others, including Arizona and Texas, impose fewer barriers in practice by deferring to federal standards. California remains comparatively more restrictive for advanced manufacturing.SEC. 2. Section 11112 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:11112. (a) Sections 11100, 11100.1, 11103, and 11106 do not apply to chemical mixtures containing gamma-butyrolactone that are obtained or received from a source within or outside this state or are sold, transferred, exported, or otherwise furnished to any person or entity in this state or any other state.(b) Section 11107 does not apply to the mixtures described in subdivision (a) if the requirements would be imposed solely due to the presence of gamma-butyrolactone in the mixtures.(c) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Chemical mixtures containing gamma-butyrolactone” means two or more chemical substances, one of which is gamma-butyrolactone (CAS no. 96-48-0) in a concentration of 70 percent or less by weight or volume, and at least one other substance that is not solely an inert carrier or an impurity.(2) “Inert carrier” means a chemical that does not interfere with the function of gamma-butyrolactone (CAS no. 96-48-0) in the mixture but is present to aid in its delivery so it can be used in a chemical process.